Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1268.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1521. Emergency contacts and medical conditions in driver records.(a) Establishment of program.--(1) The department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police, shall establish a program that allows an individual with a driver's license or an identification card issued by the department to add emergency contacts and medical conditions on the individual's records maintained with the department and to allow access to the emergency contacts and medical conditions by law enforcement personnel performing their official duties. An individual may 123456789101112131415161718 opt into or withdraw from the program during renewal of the license or identification card or during vehicle registration. The department may establish a process that permits an individual, at any time, to opt into or withdraw from the program.(2) The department shall maintain a publicly accessible Internet website for individuals who participate in the program to add no more than two emergency contacts and the medical conditions as described under paragraph (3).(3) The medical conditions on an individual's records maintained by the department shall, upon receipt by the department of a statement that is certified by a health care provider and acceptable to the department, be limited to the following:(i) Deafness or hearing impairment.(ii) Autism spectrum disorder.(iii) A similar medical condition as provided in paragraph (4).(iv) Any other communication impediment certified by a health care provider.(4) The department may add a medical condition to the list in subsection (a)(3) provided that:(i) The department consults with, at a minimum, the Pennsylvania State Police and Medical Advisory Board.(ii) The department transmits a notice of the similar medical condition to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(5) The department shall maintain a publicly accessible Internet website that provides information to the public 20250HB1268PN1411 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relating to the program.(6) The department, in coordination with the Pennsylvania State Police, shall inform police departments in this Commonwealth of the program.(b) False reporting on medical conditions.--(1) The department may cancel or revoke an individual's participation in the program if:(i) the department determines a medical condition of the individual was fraudulently or erroneously reported to the department; or(ii) the department determines the individual, during an encounter with law enforcement, misrepresented a medical condition reported to the department.(2) The department shall provide an individual with notice and an opportunity to be heard before canceling or revoking the individual's participation in the program.(c) Fee prohibited.--The department may not impose a fee or charge for participation in the program.(d) Right-to-Know Law.--Information provided by an individual to the department for the program and an individual's participation in the program shall not be accessible for inspection or duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1268PN1411 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324